Utah statutes.
58-11a-502.   Unlawful conduct.

Unlawful conduct includes:

(1)  practicing or engaging in, or attempting to practice or engage in activity for which a license is required under this chapter unless:

(a)  the person holds the appropriate license under this chapter; or

(b)  an exemption in Section 58-1-307 or 58-11a-304 applies;

(2)  knowingly employing any other person to engage in or practice or attempt to engage in or practice any occupation or profession licensed under this chapter if the employee is not licensed to do so under this chapter or exempt from licensure;

(3)  touching, or applying an instrument or device to the following areas of a client's body:

(a)  the genitals or the anus, except in cases where the patron states to a licensee that the patron requests a hair removal procedure and signs a written consent form, which must also include the witnessed signature of a legal guardian if the patron is a minor, authorizing the licensee to perform a hair removal procedure; or

(b)  the breast of a female patron, except in cases in which the female patron states to a licensee that the patron requests breast skin procedures and signs a written consent form, which must also include the witnessed signature of a parent or legal guardian if the patron is a minor, authorizing the licensee to perform breast skin procedures;

(4)  using or possessing as a nail technician a solution composed of at least 10% methyl methacrylete on a client; or

(5)  performing an ablative procedure as defined in Section 58-67-102.

